Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.254

Mortgage loan originator licensing process—Rules—Interim procedures.

For the purposes of implementing an orderly and efficient mortgage loan originator licensing process, the director may establish licensing rules and interim procedures for licensing and acceptance of applications. For previously registered or licensed individuals the director may establish expedited review and licensing procedures.

[ 2009 c 120 s 20.]

NOTES:

Findings—Declaration—2009 c 120: See note following RCW 31.04.015.